Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-104.24
Child born out of wedlock; proceedings; court priority.

All proceedings pursuant to sections 43-104.08 to 43-104.23 have the highest priority and shall be advanced on the court docket to provide for their earliest practical disposition. An adjournment or continuance of a proceeding pursuant to sections 43-104.08 to 43-104.23 shall not be granted without a showing of good cause.

Laws 1995, LB 712, § 17.